District of Columbia statutes.
15-323

Limitation on seizure of real property.

Real property or rent shall not be seized for a debt, as long as the present goods and chattels of the debtor are sufficient to pay it, and the debtor himself is ready to satisfy the debt.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 528, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 15-323.
1973 Ed., § 15-323.